New York, session 2025-2026, S2650.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 2116-a of the education law is amended by adding a 2 new subdivision 5 to read as follows: 3 5. Each school district shall in a timely fashion post on its website 4 a copy of each required ancillary agreement mandated to be signed by a 5 pupil, parent or guardian as a condition to attend any school in such 6 district. Each school district shall keep a copy of such ancillary 7 agreements on file in addition to making the agreement available on its 8 website. 9 § 2. Subdivision 1 of section 2854 of the education law is amended by 10 adding a new paragraph (g) to read as follows: 11 (g) A charter school shall be subject to the requirement in subdivi- 12 sion five of section twenty-one hundred sixteen-a of this title to post 13 on its website in a timely fashion a copy of each required ancillary 14 agreement mandated to be signed by a pupil, parent or guardian as a 15 condition to attend such charter school. Each charter school shall keep 16 a copy of such ancillary agreements on file in addition to making the 17 agreement available on its website. 18 § 3. This act shall take effect on the thirtieth day after it shall 19 have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD06231-01-5